Louisiana, session 2026, HB307.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
9 Section 1. R.S. 18:1505.2(Q) and (R) and R.S. 24:56(A) through (E) and 56.1 are
10 hereby repealed in their entirety.
DIGEST
The digest printed below was prepared by House Legislative Services. It constitutes no part
of the legislative instrument. The keyword, one-liner, abstract, and digest do not constitute
part of the law or proof or indicia of legislative intent. [R.S. 1:13(B) and 24:177(E)]
HB 307 Original 2026 Regular Session Green
Abstract: Repeals the prohibition against a legislator or the governor receiving or
depositing campaign contributions during a regular legislative session and repeals
the prohibition against a fundraising function being held by or for a legislator during
a regular or extraordinary legislative session.
Present law prohibits a legislator or his principal campaign committee or any subsidiary
committee thereof from accepting or depositing a contribution, loan, or transfer of funds or
accept and use any in-kind contributions as defined by present law for his own campaign for
his current office during a regular legislative session. Provides for circumstances in which
a legislator or his principal campaign committee or any subsidiary committee thereof accepts
or deposits a contribution, loan, or transfer during a regular legislative session. Provides for
exceptions.
Page 1 of 2

HLS 26RS-898 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 307
Proposed law repeals present law.
Present law prohibits the governor or his principal campaign committee or any subsidiary
committee thereof from accepting or depositing a contribution, loan, or transfer of funds or
accept and use any in-kind contributions as defined by present law for his own campaign for
his current office during a regular legislative session or within 30 days after such regular
legislative session adjourns. Provides for circumstances in which the governor or his
principal campaign committee or any subsidiary committee thereof accepts or deposits a
contribution, loan, or transfer during a regular legislative session. Provides for exceptions.
Proposed law repeals present law.
Present law (R.S. 24:56) prohibits a fundraising function for or by a legislator from being
held during a regular legislative session unless notice of the function has been given not less
than 30 days prior to the function. Prohibits a lobbyist from offering to provide to a
legislator or his principal campaign committee any campaign contribution or loan resulting
from a fundraising function held during a legislative session, unless the provisions of present
law are complied with. Prohibits a legislator from soliciting or receiving any campaign
contribution or loan for himself or his political campaign committee from a lobbyist
resulting from a fundraising function held during a regular legislative session, unless the
provisions of present law are complied with. Provides the provisions of present law shall
not apply to any contribution, loan, or transfer of funds prohibited by present law (R.S.
18:1505.2(Q)) and shall not be construed in a manner to permit acceptance of any
contribution, loan, or transfer of funds prohibited by present law (R.S. 18:1505.2(Q)).
Proposed law repeals present law.
Present law prohibits a state employee in his official capacity or on behalf of his agency
from lobbying for or against any matter intended to have the effect of law pending before
the legislature or any committee thereof. Prohibits a state employee in his official capacity
or on behalf of his agency from entering into a contract with a lobbyist or contract for
lobbying services to lobby for or against any matter intended to have the effect of law
pending before the legislature or any committee thereof. Provides for what is considered a
contract for the purpose of present law. Requires a person who enters into a contract to act
in a representative capacity for the purpose of lobbying to register or file a supplemental
registration providing the name and address of the person by whom he is employed or
engaged and if different whose interests he represents.
Proposed law retains present law.
Present law (R.S. 24:56.1) prohibits a fundraising function held by or for a legislator from
being held during any session of the legislature convened pursuant to present constitution
(Art. III, §2(B)) unless notice of the function has been filed no later than two business days
after the issuance of the proclamation stating the objects of the session.
Proposed law repeals present law.
(Repeals R.S. 18:1505.2(Q) and (R) and R.S. 24:56(A)-(E) and 56.1)
Page 2 of 2